District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-452

Establishment and application; availability; publicity.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 201, 34 DCR 689
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(i), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-452.